Utah statutes.
55-12-117.   Responsibility of parents.

The compact administrator is authorized to take appropriate action to recover from parents or guardians, any and all costs expended by the state, or any of its subdivisions, to return a delinquent or nondelinquent juvenile to this state, for care provided pursuant to any supplementary agreement, or for care pending the return of the juvenile to this state.

